en: Tuna spreads
fr: Tartinables au thon, Préparations de thon à tartiner
hr: Namazi od tune
nl: Tonijnpastas

en: Meat spreads, Meat spread
fr: Préparations de viande à tartiner
hr: Mesni namazi
nl: Vleespastas

en: Chicken spreads
fr: Préparations de poulet à tartiner

de: Fleischsalat, Fleischsalate
fr: Salades de viande
nl: Vleessalades

en: Nduja
xx: Nduja

en: Spreads with foie gras
fr: Tartinables au foie gras

en: Savory mousses, savory mousse, savoury mousses, savoury mousse
de: Fleischpasteten, Fleischaufstrich
es: Mousses saladas, Mousse salada
fi: suolaiset mousset
fr: Mousses salées, Mousse salée, mousses salés, mousse salé
hr: Slane pjenice
it: mousse salate
nl: Smeerworsten

en: Duck mousse
fr: Mousses de canard, mousses de canards, mousse de canards, mousse de canard
hr: Pačji mousse
nl: Eendemoussen

fr: Mousses de foies, mousses de foie, mousse de foies, mousse de foie
nl: Smeerleverworsten, Leverpasteien, Levermoussen, Saksische leverworsten

en: Cured sausages
de: Würstchen
es: Embutidos curados
fi: Suolatut makkarat
fr: Saucissons, Saucisson
hr: Trajne kobasice
it: salami e salsicce stagionate
nl: Worstjes
pt: Charcutarias curadas
zh: 腌制香肠

en: Pepperoni
xx: Pepperoni

en: Strolghino
it: Strolghino

en: cut, cold cuts, cold meat
de: Aufschnitt
hr: Izrezati
zh: 冷肉

en: Chorizos, Chorizo
af: Chorizo
be: Чарыза
bg: Чорисо
br: Chorizo
ca: xoriço
cs: Chorizo
da: Chorizo
de: Chorizos
el: Τσορίθο
eo: Ĉorizo
es: chorizo
eu: Txorizo
fa: چوریزو
fi: chorizo
fr: chorizo
gl: Chourizo
he: צ'וריסו
hr: Chorizo
hu: chorizo
hy: Չորիսո
id: Chorizo
it: chorizo
ja: チョリソ
jv: Chorizo
ko: 초리소
nb: chorizo
nl: chorizo, chorizos
oc: chorizo
pl: chorizo
pt: chouriço
ru: Чоризо
sc: Chorizo
sv: chorizo
tl: Longganisa
uk: Чорісос
vi: Chorizo
zh: 乔利佐

en: Spicy pork sausage in large slices
fr: Chorizo en tranches, Chiffonade de chorizo
hr: Začinjena svinjska kobasica u velikim kriškama
nl: Gesneden chorizo

en: Spicy pork sausage with red pepper in large slices
fr: Chorizo supérieur doux en tranches, Chorizo supérieur fort en tranches

en: Dry spicy pork sausage with red pepper
fr: Chorizo supérieur doux, Chorizo supérieur fort

en: Iberian chorizo
fr: Chorizo Iberico, Chorizo ibérique

en: Sarta chorizo
fr: Chorizo ​​Sarte, Chorizo ​​Sarta

en: Rosette dry sausage
fr: Rosettes, rosette, rosette de Lyon